District of Columbia statutes.
47-3715

Monthly report of Register of Wills.

The Register of Wills shall report to the Mayor on every order appointing a personal representative in the District for the estate of any decedent. The report shall be in a form prepared by the Register of Wills, shall be filed with the Mayor at least once every month, and shall contain the name of the decedent, the date of his or her death, the name and address of the personal representative, and the value of the estate, as shown by the petition for probate.

Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-168, § 16, 33 DCR 7008
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

History

1981 Ed., § 47-3715.

Prior Codifications